District of Columbia statutes.
4-1341.06

Corporate powers.

The Trust Fund may exercise those powers conferred upon a nonprofit corporation pursuant to Chapters 1 and 4 of Title 29.

History

Nov. 20, 1993, D.C. Law 10-56, § 7, 40 DCR 7222
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(b), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2136.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-378 substituted “Chapters 1 and 4 of Title 29” for “subchapter I of Chapter 3 of Title 29”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 4-1341.01.